test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kuu29_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kuu: # Noun (29) kuu 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kuu+N+Sg+Nom: kuu
     kuu+N+Sg+Gen: kuu
     kuu+N+Sg+Par: kuud
     kuu+N+Sg+Ill: [kuuhtõ, kuuhõ, kuudõ]
     kuu+N+Sg+Ine: [kuun, kuuh, kuuhn]
     kuu+N+Sg+Ela: kuust
     kuu+N+Sg+All: kuulõ
     kuu+N+Sg+Ade: kuul
     kuu+N+Sg+Abl: kuult
     kuu+N+Sg+Tra: kuus
     kuu+N+Sg+Ter: kuuniq
     kuu+N+Sg+Abe: kuuldaq
     kuu+N+Sg+Com: kuugaq
     kuu+N+Pl+Nom: kuuq
     kuu+N+Pl+Gen: kuiõ
     kuu+N+Pl+Par: kuiõ
     kuu+N+Pl+Ill: [kuihtõ, kuihõ, kuiõhtõ]
     kuu+N+Pl+Ine: [kuin, kuih, kuihn, kuiõn, kuiõh, kuiõhn]
     kuu+N+Pl+Ela: [kuist, kuiõst]
     kuu+N+Pl+All: [kuilõ, kuiõlõ]
     kuu+N+Pl+Ade: [kuil, kuiõl]
     kuu+N+Pl+Abl: [kuilt, kuiõlt]
     kuu+N+Pl+Tra: [kuis, kuiõs]
     kuu+N+Pl+Ter: kuiõniq
     kuu+N+Pl+Abe: [kuiõldaq, kuildaq]
     kuu+N+Pl+Com: kuiõgaq
